Utah statutes.
11-30-8.   Injunction -- Other orders.

Upon motion of the public body, whether before or after the date set for hearing, the court may enjoin the commencement, prosecution, or maintenance of any other action involving the validity of the bonds, and may order all other actions or proceedings consolidated with the validation proceeding pending before it, and may make orders which are necessary or proper to effect consolidation or to avoid unnecessary costs or delays.  Those orders are not appealable.

